Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2621
Acceptance of appointment; consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or mailed to him by ordinary mail at his address as listed in the court records and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 239, UPC § 5-305.